Tennessee, session 114, SB1611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 42-5-202, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) Notwithstanding another law or a private act to the contrary, a joint board
established by two (2) municipalities and two (2) counties pursuant to an interlocal
agreement entered into pursuant to title 12, chapter 9, for the purpose of operating an
airport, is vested with all the powers, rights, duties, and privileges conferred upon a joint
board under this chapter and all the powers, rights, duties, and privileges of a regional
airport authority under chapter 3 of this title. Such board is a public instrumentality of the
creating municipalities and counties and a public body corporate and politic under the
laws of this state. Such joint board may file a charter with the secretary of state
containing such information as is required for a public nonprofit corporation to evidence
the existence of such joint board as a corporate entity and such other information as
may be deemed relevant by the joint board. Notwithstanding this part, the governance
of the joint board, including the terms of office of the members of the board and the
composition of the board, must be set forth in the interlocal agreement creating the joint
board and not by any other provision of this title.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1611
010376
- 1 -